Colorado, session 2026A, HB1143.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Colorado's prosperity depends on policies that ensure individuals
can participate fully in education, training, volunteer service, and civic life
while maintaining strong protections for vulnerable populations;
(b) State and federal agencies, including the Colorado bureau of
investigation and the federal bureau of investigation, conduct name-based
and fingerprint-based background checks that do not require a social
security number and are sufficient to identify criminal history and protect
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

public safety;
(c) Despite this, some public and private entities require a social
security number for non-employment-based background checks, preventing
otherwise qualified individuals from accessing non-employment-based
educational opportunities, such as required clinical placements, internships,
apprenticeships, volunteer opportunities, and other educational or training
experiences;
(d) These barriers disproportionately affect individuals who lawfully
lack a social security number, delaying or preventing completion of
educational programs and entry into high-demand professions without
advancing public safety;
(e) Allowing the use of an individual taxpayer identification number
as an alternative identifier preserves the integrity of background screening
processes while expanding access to opportunity; and
(f) Lifting these barriers still maintains existing criminal background
screening standards and does not alter employment-related background
check requirements.
(2) Therefore, the general assembly declares that:
(a) It is the public policy of the state that safety and not immigration
status should determine access to educational and training opportunities;
and
(b) Removing unnecessary barriers to non-employment-based
educational and training experiences strengthens Colorado's workforce,
protects vulnerable populations, and advances the state's commitment to
opportunity, dignity, and shared prosperity.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 8-2-128.5 as
follows:
8-2-128.5. Prohibitions of non-employer - requiring social
security number - exceptions - definitions.
(1) (a) AN ENTITY THAT REQUIRES AN APPLICANT TO PROVIDE A
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER FOR A BACKGROUND CHECK AS A CONDITION TO
PARTICIPATE IN OR OTHERWISE AVAIL THEMSELF OF A
NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY SHALL ALSO ACCEPT
AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER IN LIEU OF A SOCIAL
SECURITY NUMBER.
(b) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A
LICENSED OR CERTIFIED HOSPITAL OR A COVERED SCHOOL THAT REQUIRES
AN APPLICANT TO PROVIDE A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER FOR A BACKGROUND
CHECK AS A CONDITION TO PARTICIPATE IN OR OTHERWISE AVAIL THEMSELF
OF A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY IS NOT
REQUIRED TO ACCEPT AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER,
BUT SHALL ACCEPT A FINGERPRINT-BASED BACKGROUND CHECK IN LIEU OF
A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER.
(c) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, A STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE THAT
REQUIRES AN APPLICANT TO PROVIDE A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER FOR A
BACKGROUND CHECK AS A CONDITION TO PARTICIPATE IN OR OTHERWISE
AVAIL THEMSELF OF A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATION OPPORTUNITY
THAT INVOLVES WORK WITH A VULNERABLE POPULATION SHALL ACCEPT
EITHER AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OR A
FINGERPRINT-BASED BACKGROUND CHECK, AS DETERMINED BY THE STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE, IN LIEU
OF A SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER.
(d) NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES
COVERED BY THIS SECTION INCLUDE, BUT ARE NOT LIMITED TO, AN UNPAID
VOLUNTEER ROLE; UNPAID INTERNSHIP; UNPAID PRE-APPRENTICESHIP; AND
UNPAID CLINICAL EXPERIENCE IN A HOSPITAL OR CLINIC, INCLUDING
NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES REQUIRED FOR
GRADUATION OR LICENSURE IN A HEALTH-RELATED ACADEMIC PROGRAM.
(e) THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO POSITIONS THAT CONSTITUTE
EMPLOYMENT AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-70-115.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION, AN
APPLICANT MAY BE REQUIRED TO DISCLOSE THEIR SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

(a) TO AN ENTITY REQUIRED TO COLLECT THE SOCIAL SECURITY
NUMBER:
(I) BY STATE OR FEDERAL LAW OR RULE;
(II) BY A GOVERNMENTAL OR ACCREDITATION ORGANIZATION'S
MANDATORY PROGRAM OF LEGAL COMPLIANCE TO CHECK ANY
GOVERNMENTAL BACKGROUND CHECK DATABASE;
(III) TO COMPLY WITH REQUIREMENTS FOR A FEDERAL OR STATE
GRANT; OR
(IV) TO REIMBURSE AN APPLICANT FOR EXPENSES INCURRED IN THE
ACTUAL PERFORMANCE OF THEIR DUTIES ONLY IF THE REIMBURSEMENT
CANNOT BE PROCESSED WITH AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER OR EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER IN ACCORDANCE WITH
APPLICABLE FEDERAL OR STATE TAX LAW THAT REQUIRES USING THE SOCIAL
SECURITY NUMBER; OR
(b) IF THE APPLICANT IS APPLYING FOR A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED
EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY THAT REQUIRES A PERSON TO SIGN CHECKS OR
ENGAGE IN OTHER TRANSACTIONS INVOLVING THE ENTITY'S ASSETS OR
ACCOUNTS AND THE FINANCIAL INSTITUTION HOLDING THOSE ASSETS OR
ACCOUNTS DOES NOT ACCEPT AN INDIVIDUAL TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER OR EMPLOYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER IN PLACE OF A SOCIAL
SECURITY NUMBER TO VERIFY THE IDENTITY OF AUTHORIZED PERSONS.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "COVERED SCHOOL" MEANS A SCHOOL THAT SERVES STUDENTS
IN ANY OF GRADES KINDERGARTEN THROUGH TWELVE, BUT ONLY IN
RELATION TO STUDENTS IT ENROLLS WHO SEEK A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED
OPPORTUNITY AT THE SCHOOL OR THROUGH A PARTNERSHIP BETWEEN THE
SCHOOL AND ANOTHER ENTITY.
(b) "ENTITY" MEANS A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION;
A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE; A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION THAT IS EXEMPT
FROM TAXATION UNDER SECTION 501 (c)(3) OF THE FEDERAL "INTERNAL
REVENUE CODE OF 1986"; A VOLUNTEER ORGANIZATION; A COVERED
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

SCHOOL; OR THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES AS LICENSED OR CERTIFIED AS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-1.5-103: A CLINIC, CLINICAL PARTNERSHIP,
URGENT CARE CENTER, RETAIL HEALTH CLINIC, HOSPITAL, TELEMEDICINE
SERVICE, OR CONCIERGE MEDICAL PROVIDER.
(c) "LICENSED OR CERTIFIED HOSPITAL" MEANS A HOSPITAL
LICENSED OR CERTIFIED AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 25-1.5-103, INCLUDING
THE UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO ANSCHUTZ MEDICAL CAMPUS.
(d) "LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE" MEANS A LOCAL DISTRICT COLLEGE
AUTHORIZED PURSUANT TO ARTICLE 71 OF TITLE 23.
(e) "STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION" MEANS A STATE
INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 23-18-102, NOT
INCLUDING THE UNIVERSITY OF COLORADO ANSCHUTZ MEDICAL CAMPUS.
(f) "VULNERABLE POPULATION" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS
SUSCEPTIBLE TO ABUSE OR MISTREATMENT BECAUSE OF THE INDIVIDUAL'S:
(I) AGE;
(II) DISABILITY;
(III) FRAILTY;
(IV) BEHAVIORAL OR MENTAL HEALTH;
(V) INTELLECTUAL OR DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITY; OR
(VI) ILL HEALTH.
(4) THIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT AN ENTITY FROM COMPLYING
WITH 8 U.S.C. SEC. 1621.
(5) (a) AN ENTITY THAT DOES NOT ACCEPT AN INDIVIDUAL
TAXPAYER IDENTIFICATION NUMBER IN VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF
THIS SECTION OR A FINGERPRINT-BASED BACKGROUND CHECK IN VIOLATION
OF SUBSECTION (1)(b) or (1)(c) OF THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL
PENALTY OF TWO THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR THE FIRST VIOLATION AND FIVE
THOUSAND DOLLARS FOR EACH SUBSEQUENT VIOLATION.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

(b) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IS AUTHORIZED TO ENFORCE THIS
SECTION.
(c) A CIVIL PENALTY COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (5)
MUST BE TRANSFERRED TO THE STATE TREASURER, WHO SHALL CREDIT IT TO
THE IMMIGRATION LEGAL DEFENSE FUND ESTABLISHED PURSUANT TO
SECTION 8-3.8-101.
(6) AN ENTITY THAT CONDUCTS A FINGERPRINT-BASED BACKGROUND
CHECK OF AN APPLICANT FOR A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL
OPPORTUNITY SHALL COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS FOR EMPLOYERS
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 6-1-1314.
(7) (a) (I) AN APPLICANT FOR A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED
EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY WITH ONE OF THE FOLLOWING ENTITIES WHO
DECLINES TO PROVIDE THEIR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER SHALL SUBMIT TO
A FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK:
(A) A LICENSED OR CERTIFIED HOSPITAL;
(B) A COVERED SCHOOL; OR
(C) A STATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION OR A LOCAL
DISTRICT COLLEGE, FOR A NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATION
OPPORTUNITY THAT INVOLVES WORK WITH A VULNERABLE POPULATION.
(II) THE ENTITY SHALL DETERMINE WHETHER THE APPLICANT OR THE
ENTITY PAYS THE COSTS ASSOCIATED WITH THE FINGERPRINT-BASED
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(b) AFTER SUBMITTING AN APPLICATION FOR A
NON-EMPLOYMENT-BASED EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITY AND DECLINING TO
PROVIDE THEIR SOCIAL SECURITY NUMBER, THE APPLICANT SHALL HAVE THE
APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TAKEN BY A LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY,
OR A THIRD PARTY APPROVED BY THE COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION, TO OBTAIN A FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY
RECORD CHECK. THE APPLICANT SHALL AUTHORIZE THE THIRD PARTY
TAKING THE APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TO SUBMIT, AND THE THIRD PARTY
SHALL SUBMIT, THE COMPLETE SET OF THE APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TO
THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION TO CONDUCT A
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

FINGERPRINT-BASED CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(c) IF AN APPROVED THIRD PARTY TAKES THE PERSON'S
FINGERPRINTS, THE FINGERPRINTS MAY BE ELECTRONICALLY CAPTURED
USING LIVESCAN EQUIPMENT APPROVED BY THE COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION. THIRD-PARTY VENDORS SHALL NOT KEEP THE APPLICANT'S
INFORMATION FOR MORE THAN THIRTY DAYS.
(d) THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL USE THE
APPLICANT'S FINGERPRINTS TO CONDUCT A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECK USING THE BUREAU'S RECORDS. THE COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION SHALL FORWARD THE FINGERPRINTS TO THE FEDERAL
BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION FOR CONDUCTING A FINGERPRINT-BASED
CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK. THE COLORADO BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION, APPLICANT, ENTITY, AND THIRD PARTY TAKING
FINGERPRINTS SHALL COMPLY WITH THE FEDERAL BUREAU OF
INVESTIGATION'S REQUIREMENTS FOR A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK.
(e) THE COLORADO BUREAU OF INVESTIGATION SHALL RETURN THE
RESULTS OF ITS CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK TO THE ENTITY, AND THE
ENTITY IS AUTHORIZED TO RECEIVE THE RESULTS OF THE FEDERAL BUREAU
OF INVESTIGATION'S CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK. THE ENTITY SHALL
USE THE INFORMATION RESULTING FROM THE CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD
CHECKS TO INVESTIGATE AND DETERMINE WHETHER AN APPLICANT IS
QUALIFIED FOR AN OPPORTUNITY PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS
SECTION.
(f) WHEN THE RESULTS OF A CRIMINAL HISTORY RECORD CHECK OF
AN APPLICANT PERFORMED PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (7) REVEAL A
RECORD OF ARREST WITHOUT A DISPOSITION, THE ENTITY SHALL REQUIRE
THE APPLICANT TO SUBMIT TO A NAME-BASED JUDICIAL RECORD CHECK, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 22-2-119.3 (6)(d).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-31-101, amend
(1)(v) and (1)(w); and add (1)(y) as follows:
24-31-101. Powers and duties of attorney general.
(1) The attorney general:
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

(v) May expend money, manage staff, and perform other
administrative functions essential for the operation of a district attorney's
office when appointed by executive order of the governor; and
(w) May conduct jail assessments in collaboration with the jail
standards advisory committee, created pursuant to section 30-10-530,
pursuant to section 24-31-118; AND
(y) MAY BRING A CIVIL ACTION TO ENFORCE SECTION 8-2-128.5.
SECTION 4. Applicability. This act applies to contracts entered
into and background checks requested on or after the effective date of this
act.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1143

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1143